Mississippi, session 2026, HB292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this subsection: (a)  "Food allergy awareness training" means training on major food allergens and the symptoms that a major food allergen could cause in a sensitive individual who has an allergic reaction conducted in accordance with the Food Code used by the State Department of Health and any additional Mississippi food regulations implemented by the department. (b)  "Restaurant" means a business that is primarily engaged in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption, which has suitable kitchen facilities on the premises where the food is prepared, and which has suitable seating facilities for guests. (2)  Food allergy awareness training for restaurant employees must cover and assess knowledge and understanding of gluten as a food allergen, including sources of gluten, symptoms of gluten intolerance and celiac disease, the importance of gluten-free food preparation and handling, and proper cleaning methods to prevent gluten contamination. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.